New York, session 2025-2026, S5433.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 579 of the public health law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. (a) Any licensed pharmacists may order infectious disease tests, 4 approved by the food and drug administration, to detect the infectious 5 disease or its antibodies, and administering such tests, subject to 6 certificate of waiver requirements pursuant to the federal clinical 7 laboratory improvement act of nineteen hundred eighty-eight, to patients 8 suspected of an infectious disease, or suspected of having recovered 9 from an infectious disease, subject to completion of appropriate train- 10 ing developed by the department. 11 (b) Licensed pharmacists shall be designated as a qualified healthcare 12 professional for the purpose of directing a limited service laboratory, 13 pursuant to subdivision three of this section, to test patients 14 suspected of an infectious disease or its antibodies provided that such 15 test is approved by the food and drug administration and waived for its 16 use in a limited service laboratory. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08987-01-5